Florida, session 2026, SB1066.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 50 51 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âNortheast Florida 52 Rivers, Springs, and Community Investment Act.â 53 Section 2.âSection 373.464, Florida Statutes, is created to 54 read: 55 373.464âOcklawaha River restoration, recreation, and 56 economic development.â 57 (1)âPROJECT LEAD.âThe department shall, no later than 58 August 31, 2026, hire a full-time equivalent contractor or 59 employee, whose position title will be project lead, to oversee 60 the implementation of this act. The project lead must have 61 subject matter expertise in conservation and recreation 62 planning. 63 (2)âPROJECT PLAN.â 64 (a)âBy July 1, 2027, the department shall develop a project 65 plan for the restoration of the Ocklawaha River. The project 66 plan must provide for restoration and increased resiliency and 67 recreation benefits of the Ocklawaha and St. Johns Rivers and 68 Silver Springs. The project plan must be designed to restore the 69 Ocklawaha River hydrology and floodplain function to the 70 approximate conditions that existed before the construction of 71 the Cross Florida Barge Canal project and its associated project 72 works, including, but not limited to, the Kirkpatrick Dam and 73 Buckman Lock. The project plan must be based on the restoration 74 design and steps set forth in the departmentâs pending Joint 75 Application for Environmental Resource and Federal Dredge and 76 Fill Permit. The project plan must incorporate the best 77 available science and include engineering and design updates, 78 including topographic and bathymetric surveys, and precise 79 estimates of material to be dredged or excavated. In addition, 80 the project plan must provide recommendations for road and 81 bridge construction which are compatible with the partial 82 restoration plan and ensure continued access for the communities 83 west of the project. The project plan must include estimates by 84 fiscal year of the cost of implementing the project plan and 85 potential sources of funding for such costs. 86 (b)âNotwithstanding any law or rule, the project plan for 87 the restoration of the Ocklawaha River is an environmental 88 restoration or enhancement project subject to a general permit 89 from the department and water management districts for 90 environmental restoration or enhancement pursuant to rule 62 91 330.405, Florida Administrative Code, and rule 62-330.485, 92 Florida Administrative Code. 93 (c)âSubject to the provision of state, federal, or other 94 funds, the department shall complete the restoration project 95 plan by December 31, 2032. 96 (3)âNORTHEAST FLORIDA RIVER AND SPRINGS RECREATION AND 97 ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ADVISORY COUNCIL.â 98 (a)âEstablishment of the council.â 99 1.Â By October 31, 2026, the Northeast Florida River and 100 Springs Recreation and Economic Development Advisory Council, an 101 advisory council as defined in s. 20.03(7), shall be established 102 and assigned to the department. The council shall be 103 administratively housed within the department. The project lead 104 shall serve as the council chair, and the members shall meet at 105 the call of the project lead. Members shall serve without 106 compensation but are entitled to reimbursement for per diem and 107 travel expenses pursuant to s. 112.061. Council members shall 108 serve 4-year terms, except that the initial terms shall be 109 staggered. 110 2.âThe council shall be composed of the following 16 111 members: 112 a.âNine members of the council shall be appointed by and 113 serve at the pleasure of the Governor and shall include: 114 (I)âTwo representatives of river recreation-related 115 businesses local to Marion or Putnam County. 116 (II)âTwo representatives of outdoor recreation user groups, 117 one of whom represents fishing interests local to Marion or 118 Putnam County. 119 (III)âOne representative of the departmentâs Office of 120 Greenways and Trails. 121 (IV)âOne representative of the Florida Fish and Wildlife 122 Conservation Commissionâs Division of Freshwater Fisheries 123 Management. 124 (V)âOne representative of the Florida Fish and Wildlife 125 Conservation Commissionâs Imperiled Species Management Section. 126 (VI)âOne representative of the Department of Commerce. 127 (VII)âOne representative of an environmental community 128 support organization who has subject matter expertise in springs 129 or rivers. 130 b.âSix members of the council shall be appointed by the 131 boards of county commissioners for the following counties: 132 (I)âPutnam County shall appoint two members, one of whom 133 oversees parks and recreation for the county. 134 (II)âMarion County shall appoint two members, one of whom 135 oversees parks and recreation for the county. 136 (III)âClay County shall appoint one member. 137 (IV)âSt. Johns County shall appoint one member. 138 c.âOne member shall be the commanding officer of Naval Air 139 Station Jacksonville or his or her designee. 140 (b)âReport.âThe council shall submit an advisory report to 141 the Governor, the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the 142 House of Representatives, and the department by February 1, 143 2027. The report must include all of the following: 144 1.âRecommendations for projects to be included in the 145 outdoor recreation plan created in subsection (4), including 146 priorities for state-funded land projects. 147 2.âRecommendations to the department for the creation of 148 guidelines to govern the grant program created in subsection 149 (5). 150 3.âRecommendations to the Department of Commerce for the 151 creation of guidelines to administer the economic development 152 program created in subsection (6). 153 4.âRecommendations for measures to minimize the impact of 154 the restoration plan on property owners or businesses directly 155 affected by the restoration project. 156 (c)âRepeal.âIn accordance with s. 20.052(8), this 157 subsection is repealed October 2, 2029, unless reviewed and 158 saved from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 159 (4)âOUTDOOR RECREATION PLAN.â 160 (a)âThe department, in collaboration with the Fish and 161 Wildlife Conservation Commission, the Northeast Florida River 162 and Springs Recreation and Economic Development Advisory 163 Council, and the local governments of river communities in Clay, 164 Marion, Putnam, and St. Johns Counties, shall develop an outdoor 165 recreation plan. 166 (b)âThe outdoor recreation plan must identify and implement 167 projects for enhanced and expanded river and springs access for 168 recreational activities, such as fishing, hunting, swimming, 169 wildlife viewing, paddling, and hiking. Such projects must be 170 compatible with the project plan and applicable statutes. The 171 outdoor recreation plan must be made available for public 172 comment before its implementation. 173 (c)âThe department shall implement the outdoor recreation 174 plan by January 1, 2028. 175 (d)âSubject to the provision of state, federal, or other 176 funds, the department shall complete projects on state-owned 177 lands identified in the outdoor recreation plan by December 31, 178 2035. 179 (5)âGRANT PROGRAM.â 180 (a)âBy January 1, 2028, the department shall develop a 181 grant program for river communities in Clay, Marion, Putnam, and 182 St. Johns Counties to implement the outdoor recreation plan. 183 (b)âThe grant program must be compatible with the project 184 plan and outdoor recreation plan. 185 (c)âThe department shall implement the grant program by 186 January 1, 2028. 187 (6)âECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM.â 188 (a)âThe Department of Commerce shall develop guidelines and 189 processes for an economic development program for Marion and 190 Putnam Counties. The economic development program must support 191 projects that encourage job creation, capital investment, and 192 strengthening and diversification of each countyâs economy. 193 (b)âThe economic development program must be compatible 194 with the project plan, the outdoor recreation plan, and the 195 grant program. 196 (c)âThe Department of Commerce shall implement the economic 197 development program by January 1, 2028. 198 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.